Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2015
Solid waste management plan, defined.

Solid waste management plan shall mean a plan adopted by a county or municipality, including a joint plan adopted by an agency, for integrated solid waste management.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 15.